Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2057
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-2056 to 71-2061, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1) Hospital health services means, but is not limited to,
any health care clinical, diagnostic, or rehabilitation service and any administrative,
managerial, health system, or operational service incident to such service;

(2) Market strategy means any plan, strategy, or device developed
or intended to promote, sell, or offer to sell any hospital health service;

(3) Strategic plan means any plan, strategy, or device developed
or intended to construct, operate, or maintain a health facility or to engage
in providing, promoting, or selling a hospital health service; and

(4) Tangible benefit means, but is not limited to, any (a)
reasonable expectation of a demonstrable increase in or maintenance of usage
of the provider's services, (b) contractual provision requiring quality control
of patient care and participation in a resource monitoring procedure, (c) reasonable expectation
of prompt payment for any service rendered,
or (d) activity that promotes health or furthers the provider's mission.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 366, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 13.